Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 426 of Title 10, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any child care program licensed by the Department of Human
Services and rated as a Five Star program that has been awarded and
maintains active national accreditation by a nationally recognized
accrediting body approved by the Department shall be deemed to have

Req. No. 16587 Page 1

met all quality standards required under the Quality Rating and
Improvement System (QRIS) except Master Teacher requirements.
B. A program described in subsection A of this section shall
not be subject to additional quality standards or QRIS evaluation
visits beyond those required for licensure, provided the program
maintains its accreditation in good standing.
C. The Department shall not impose duplicative standards,
documentation requirements, assessments, or site visits for purposes
of QRIS participation in a nationally accredited program.
D. The Department may verify accreditation status through
documentation provided by the program that the accrediting body
provides to the program.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16587 CMA 02/19/26









Req. No. 16587 Page 2